Utah statutes.
70A-2a-211.   Warranties against interference and against infringement -- Lessee's obligation against infringement.

(1)  There is in a lease contract a warranty that, for the lease term, no person holds a claim to or interest in the goods that arose from an act or omission of the lessor, other than a claim by way of infringement or the like, which will interfere with the lessee's enjoyment of its leasehold interest.

(2)  Except in a finance lease, there is in a lease contract by a lessor who is a merchant regularly dealing in goods of the kind a warranty that the goods are delivered free of the rightful claim of any person by way of infringement or the like.

(3)  A lessee who furnished specifications to a lessor or a supplier shall hold the lessor and the supplier harmless against any claim by way of infringement or the like that arises out of compliance with the specifications.

